Utah statutes.
53-5-708.   Permit -- Names private.

(1) (a)  The bureau shall maintain a record in its office of any permit issued under this part.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection 63G-2-301(2)(b), the names, addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of persons receiving permits are protected records under Subsection 63G-2-305(10).

(2)  The bureau shall immediately file a copy of each permit it issues under this part.



Amended by Chapter 62, 2010 General Session

